Hawaii statutes.
[§128E-11] Penalties and fines. (a)
Any person who violates any of the emergency reporting, planning, or
notification requirements of section 128E-6 or 128E-7, or fails to pay the fees
required by section 128E-9, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less
than $1,000 but not more than $25,000 for each separate offense. Each day of
each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

(b) Any person who:

(1) Knowingly fails to report the release of a
hazardous substance or extremely hazardous substance, as required by section
128E-7, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, be fined not
less than $1,000 but not more than $25,000 for each separate offense, or
imprisoned for not more than one year, or both. For the purposes of this paragraph,
each day of each violation shall constitute a separate offense; or

(2) Intentionally obstructs or impairs, by force,
violence, physical interference, or obstacle, a representative of the
department, a hazardous materials response team, or a committee attempting to
perform the duties and functions set forth in section 128E-5, shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, be fined not less than $5,000 but not
more than $25,000 for each separate offense, or be imprisoned for not more than
one year, or both.

(c) All moneys collected under this section
shall be deposited in the state treasury and accrue to the credit of the state
general fund. [L 1993, c 300, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next